tests/cases.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../kjh.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../kjh.automorf.hfst

Tests:

  "Nominative":
    ат<n><attr> : ат
    сана<n><attr> : сана
    киме<n><attr> : киме
    тӱлгӱ<n><attr> : тӱлгӱ
    уйғу<n><attr> : уйғу
    чазы<n><attr> : чазы
    салаа<n><attr> : салаа
    кии<n><attr> : кии
    кӧзӧ<n><attr> : кӧзӧ
    чил<n><attr> : чил
    тон<n><attr> : тон
    пӱдӱріг<n><attr> : пӱдӱріг
    чӱг<n><attr> : чӱг
    сурығ<n><attr> : сурығ
    суғ<n><attr> : суғ
    тӧң<n><attr> : тӧң
    тас<n><attr> : тас
    харах<n><attr> : харах
    кӧнек<n><attr> : кӧнек
    кип<n><attr> : кип
    знамя<n><attr> : знамя
    пионер<n><attr> : пионер
    город<n><attr> : город
    конгресс<n><attr> : конгресс
    ат<n><nom> : ат
    сана<n><nom> : сана
    киме<n><nom> : киме
    тӱлгӱ<n><nom> : тӱлгӱ
    уйғу<n><nom> : уйғу
    чазы<n><nom> : чазы
    салаа<n><nom> : салаа
    кии<n><nom> : кии
    кӧзӧ<n><nom> : кӧзӧ
    чил<n><nom> : чил
    тон<n><nom> : тон
    пӱдӱріг<n><nom> : пӱдӱріг
    чӱг<n><nom> : чӱг
    сурығ<n><nom> : сурығ
    суғ<n><nom> : суғ
    тӧң<n><nom> : тӧң
    тас<n><nom> : тас
    харах<n><nom> : харах
    кӧнек<n><nom> : кӧнек
    кип<n><nom> : кип
    знамя<n><nom> : знамя
    пионер<n><nom> : пионер
    город<n><nom> : город
    конгресс<n><nom> : конгресс

  "Genitive":
    ат<n><gen> : аттың
    сана<n><gen> : сананың
    киме<n><gen> : кименің
    тӱлгӱ<n><gen> : тӱлгӱнің
    уйғу<n><gen> : уйғуның
    чазы<n><gen> : чазының
    салаа<n><gen> : салааның
    кии<n><gen> : киинің
    кӧзӧ<n><gen> : кӧзӧнің
    чил<n><gen> : чилнің
    тон<n><gen> : тонның
    пӱдӱріг<n><gen> : пӱдӱрігнің
    чӱг<n><gen> : чӱгнің
    сурығ<n><gen> : сурығның
    суғ<n><gen> : суғның
    тӧң<n><gen> : тӧңнің
    тас<n><gen> : тастың
    харах<n><gen> : харахтың
    кӧнек<n><gen> : кӧнектің
    кип<n><gen> : киптің
    знамя<n><gen> : знамяның
    пионер<n><gen> : пионернің
    город<n><gen> : городтың
    конгресс<n><gen> : конгресстің


  "Dative":
    ат<n><dat> : атха
    сана<n><dat> : санаа
    киме<n><dat> : кимее
    тӱлгӱ<n><dat> : тӱлгее
    уйғу<n><dat> : уйғаа
    чазы<n><dat> : чазаа
    салаа<n><dat> : салааға
    кии<n><dat> : кииге
    кӧзӧ<n><dat> : кӧзӧге
    чил<n><dat> : чилге
    тон<n><dat> : тонға
    пӱдӱріг<n><dat> : пӱдӱріге
    чӱг<n><dat> : чӱге
    сурығ<n><dat> : сурыға
    суғ<n><dat> : суға
    тӧң<n><dat> : тӧңе
    тас<n><dat> : тасха
    харах<n><dat> : харахха
    кӧнек<n><dat> : кӧнекке
    кип<n><dat> : кипке
    знамя<n><dat> : знамяа
    пионер<n><dat> : пионерге
    город<n><dat> : городха
    конгресс<n><dat> : конгресске


  "Accusative":
    ат<n><acc> : атты
    сана<n><acc> : сананы
    киме<n><acc> : кимені
    тӱлгӱ<n><acc> : тӱлгӱні
    уйғу<n><acc> : уйғуны
    чазы<n><acc> : чазыны
    салаа<n><acc> : салааны
    кии<n><acc> : киині
    кӧзӧ<n><acc> : кӧзӧні
    чил<n><acc> : чилні
    тон<n><acc> : тонны
    пӱдӱріг<n><acc> : пӱдӱрігні
    чӱг<n><acc> : чӱгні
    сурығ<n><acc> : сурығны
    суғ<n><acc> : суғны
    тӧң<n><acc> : тӧңні
    тас<n><acc> : тасты
    харах<n><acc> : харахты
    кӧнек<n><acc> : кӧнекті
    кип<n><acc> : кипті
    знамя<n><acc> : знамяны
    пионер<n><acc> : пионерні
    город<n><acc> : городты
    конгресс<n><acc> : конгрессті


  "Locative":
    ат<n><loc> : атта
    сана<n><loc> : санада
    киме<n><loc> : кимеде
    тӱлгӱ<n><loc> : тӱлгӱде
    уйғу<n><loc> : уйғуда
    чазы<n><loc> : чазыда
    салаа<n><loc> : салаада
    кии<n><loc> : кииде
    кӧзӧ<n><loc> : кӧзӧде
    чил<n><loc> : чилде
    тон<n><loc> : тонда
    пӱдӱріг<n><loc> : пӱдӱрігде
    чӱг<n><loc> : чӱгде
    сурығ<n><loc> : сурығда
    суғ<n><loc> : суғда
    тӧң<n><loc> : тӧңде
    тас<n><loc> : таста
    харах<n><loc> : харахта
    кӧнек<n><loc> : кӧнекте
    кип<n><loc> : кипте
    знамя<n><loc> : знамяда
    пионер<n><loc> : пионерде
    город<n><loc> : городта
    конгресс<n><loc> : конгрессте


  "Ablative":
    ат<n><abl> : аттаң
    сана<n><abl> : санадаң
    киме<n><abl> : кимедең
    тӱлгӱ<n><abl> : тӱлгӱдең
    уйғу<n><abl> : уйғудаң
    чазы<n><abl> : чазыдаң
    салаа<n><abl> : салаадаң
    кии<n><abl> : киидең
    кӧзӧ<n><abl> : кӧзӧдең
    чил<n><abl> : чилдең
    тон<n><abl> : тоннаң
    пӱдӱріг<n><abl> : пӱдӱрігдең
    чӱг<n><abl> : чӱгдең
    сурығ<n><abl> : сурығдаң
    суғ<n><abl> : суғдаң
    тӧң<n><abl> : тӧңнең
    тас<n><abl> : тастаң
    харах<n><abl> : харахтаң
    кӧнек<n><abl> : кӧнектең
    кип<n><abl> : киптең
    знамя<n><abl> : знамядаң
    пионер<n><abl> : пионердең
    город<n><abl> : городтаң
    конгресс<n><abl> : конгресстең


  "Allative":
    ат<n><all> : атсар
    сана<n><all> : саназар
    киме<n><all> : кимезер
    тӱлгӱ<n><all> : тӱлгӱзер
    уйғу<n><all> : уйғузар
    чазы<n><all> : чазызар
    салаа<n><all> : салаазар
    кии<n><all> : киизер
    кӧзӧ<n><all> : кӧзӧзер
    чил<n><all> : чилзер
    тон<n><all> : тонзар
    пӱдӱріг<n><all> : пӱдӱрігзер
    чӱг<n><all> : чӱгзер
    сурығ<n><all> : сурығзар
    суғ<n><all> : суғзар
    тӧң<n><all> : тӧңзер
    тас<n><all> : тассар
    харах<n><all> : харахсар
    кӧнек<n><all> : кӧнексер
    кип<n><all> : кипсер
    знамя<n><all> : знамязар
    пионер<n><all> : пионерзер
    город<n><all> : городсар
    конгресс<n><all> : конгрессер


  "Instrumental":
    ат<n><ins> : атнаң
    сана<n><ins> : сананаң
    киме<n><ins> : кименең
    тӱлгӱ<n><ins> : тӱлгӱнең
    уйғу<n><ins> : уйғунаң
    чазы<n><ins> : чазынаң
    салаа<n><ins> : салаанаң
    кии<n><ins> : киинең
    кӧзӧ<n><ins> : кӧзӧнең
    чил<n><ins> : чилнең
    тон<n><ins> : тоннаң
    пӱдӱріг<n><ins> : пӱдӱрігнең
    чӱг<n><ins> : чӱгнең
    сурығ<n><ins> : сурығнаң
    суғ<n><ins> : суғнаң
    тӧң<n><ins> : тӧңнең
    тас<n><ins> : таснаң
    харах<n><ins> : харахнаң
    кӧнек<n><ins> : кӧнекнең
    кип<n><ins> : кипнең
    знамя<n><ins> : знамянаң
    пионер<n><ins> : пионернең
    город<n><ins> : городнаң
    конгресс<n><ins> : конгресснең


  "Perlative":
    ат<n><prl> : атча

  "cir":
    ат<n><cir> : аттаңар

  "Plurals":
    ат<n><pl><nom> : аттар
    ат<n><pl><gen> : аттарның
    ат<n><pl><dat> : аттарға
    ат<n><pl><acc> : аттарны
    ат<n><pl><loc> : аттарда
    ат<n><pl><abl> : аттардаң
    ат<n><pl><all> : аттарзар
    ат<n><pl><ins> : аттарнаң
    ат<n><pl><prl> : аттаржа
    ат<n><pl><cir> : аттардаңар
